Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.071

Bicycle.

"Bicycle" means every device propelled solely by human power, or an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in RCW 46.04.169, upon which a person or persons may ride, having two tandem wheels either of which is sixteen inches or more in diameter, or three wheels, any one of which is twenty inches or more in diameter.

[ 2019 c 403 s 2; 2018 c 60 s 2; 1982 c 55 s 4; 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 86.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2019 c 403: "The legislature finds that a number of the collision types that have resulted in a high number of serious injuries and deaths of vulnerable roadway users can be associated with certain types of traffic infractions. To address the heightened risk to vulnerable roadway users when violations of these traffic infractions occur, the legislature intends to: (1) Introduce an additional fine as a penalty for drivers who commit these violations against a vulnerable roadway user; (2) modify when certain vulnerable roadway users may be passed by motor vehicles; and (3) clarify when and how pedestrians and bicyclists may use the roadway. To increase enforcement of all traffic infractions and offenses committed against vulnerable roadway users, the legislature intends for revenue that is collected from the new fine to be dedicated to the education of law enforcement officers, prosecutors, and judges about opportunities for the enforcement of traffic violations committed against vulnerable roadway users, with any remaining funds to be used to increase awareness by the public of the risks and penalties associated with these traffic violations. The goals of this act are to achieve a reduction in the frequency with which drivers violate traffic laws that endanger vulnerable roadway users and to encourage safe sharing of the roadway by drivers, bicyclists, pedestrians, and other vulnerable roadway users." [ 2019 c 403 s 1.]

Effective date—2019 c 403: "This act takes effect January 1, 2020." [ 2019 c 403 s 15.]